Washington statutes.
RCW 35.75.030

License fees authorized.

Every city and town by ordinance may establish and collect reasonable license fees from all persons riding a bicycle or other similar vehicle within its respective corporate limits, and may enforce the payment thereof by reasonable fines and penalties.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.75.030. Prior: 1899 c 31 s 4; RRS s 9207.]